Utah statutes.
59-1-1304.   Penalty for taxpayer failure to disclose a reportable
transaction.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a taxpayer that fails to
disclose a reportable transaction as required by Section 59-1-1303 is subject
to a penalty of $15,000.
(b)  A taxpayer that fails to disclose a listed transaction as required by
Section 59-1-1303 is subject to a penalty of $30,000.
(2)  A penalty imposed by this section is in addition to any other penalty
imposed by this title.
